Montana, session 2025, HB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 28-2-724, MCA, is amended to read:
"28-2-724. Prohibition of contracts that restrict practice -- applicability -- exceptions. (1) A
contract that creates or establishes the terms of employment, a partnership, or any other form of professional
relationship with a health care provider described in subsection (2), may not restrict the right of the health care
provider, after the termination of the employment, partnership, or other form of professional relationship, to:
(a) practice or provide services for which the provider is licensed, in any geographic area and for
any period, after the termination of the employment, partnership, or other form of professional relationship;
(b) treat, advise, consult with, or establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of
the employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship; or
(c) solicit or seek to establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of the
employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) apply to contracts or agreements involving the following
health care providers:
(a) a psychiatrist or addiction medicine psychiatrist or addiction medicine physician licensed under
Title 37, chapter 3;
(b) a psychologist licensed under Title 37, chapter 17;
(c) a naturopathic physician licensed under Title 37, chapter 26;
(c)(d) a social worker licensed under Title 37, chapter 22 39;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 198
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 198
(d)(e) a professional counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 23 39;
(e)(f) an addiction counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 35 39;
(f)(g) a marriage and family therapist licensed under Title 37, chapter 37 39; and
(g)(h) a behavioral health peer support specialist licensed under Title 37, chapter 38 39;
(h)(i) a registered professional nurse or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Title,
37, chapter 8; or
(i)(j) a physician assistant licensed under Title 37, chapter 20.
(3) This section does not apply to a contract in connection with the sale and purchase of a
practice."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to contracts made or renewed on or after [the effective
date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 198
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 198, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 198
INTRODUCED BY J. ETCHART
AN ACT REVISING THE PROHIBITION ON CONTRACTS THAT RESTRICT THE PRACTICE OF SPECIFIED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS; AMENDING SECTION 28-2-724, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE AND AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”